Utah statutes.
35A-5-202.   Contracts with providers.

(1)  In compliance with Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code, the department shall enter into a contract with one or more qualified providers to implement the workforce improvement plan created under Section 35A-5-201.

(2)  A contract entered into under this section shall be:

(a)  performance based; and

(b)  structured so that the provider receives reimbursement based on:

(i)  job development;

(ii)  participant placement in jobs;

(iii)  wages and benefits provided; and

(iv)  participant retention in jobs over at least a 12-month period.

(3)  If the department determines through the procurement process that there are no qualified providers to implement the workforce improvement plan, the department may implement the plan.



Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

